Hawaii statutes.
[§271-26.5] Change of address;
responsibility; service of orders. A motor carrier shall have, maintain
and operate from a definite place of business in the State and shall display
therein the certificate or permit issued by the public utilities commission.
The certificate or permit holder shall report any change of address or
telephone number to the commission within five business days from such change.
Communications, correspondence and service of orders and other official
documents shall be made upon the certificate or permit holder at the last
recorded address on file with the commission. Proof of service by certified or
registered mail to the last known address shall constitute a valid service of
any commission's order. [L 1978, c 66, §5]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next